Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.086

Dual credit programs—Review of financial aid policies and programs.

Institutions of higher education are encouraged to review their policies and procedures regarding financial aid for students enrolled in dual credit programs as defined in RCW 28B.15.821. Institutions of higher education are further encouraged to implement policies and procedures providing students enrolled in dual credit programs with the same access to institutional aid, including all educational expenses, as provided to resident undergraduate students.

[ 2009 c 215 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2009 c 215: See notes following RCW 28B.92.030.